test/src/morphology/N-atim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - atim - ok : # -m animate noun
     atim+N+AN+Sg: atim # asdf
     atim+N+AN+Pl: atimwak #test
     atim+N+AN+Loc: atimohk # really rare form
     
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitêm
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitêm
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otêma # final a is because of obviative 3-on-3 marking
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otêmiyiwa # obviative possessor, always has -a suffix
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitêminân
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitêminaw
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitêmiwâw
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otêmiwâwa
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otêmiyiwa
     
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitêmak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitêmak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otêma
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otêmiyiwa
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitêminânak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitêminawak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitêmiwâwak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otêmiwâwa # final a is because of obviative 3-on-3 marking
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otêmiyiwa
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Sg: acimosis
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Pl: acimosisak
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Loc: acimosisihk #rare form, but theoretically correct
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nicêmosis
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kicêmosis
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocêmosisa
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nicêmosisinân
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kicêmosisinaw
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kicêmosisiwâw
     atim+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocêmosisiwâwa
